Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 5
STATE PLAN AMENDMENTS -
WAIVER AUTHORITY

25.5-4-501. State plan amendment - federal authorization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1853, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-4-502. Federal authorization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1853, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-4-503. Waiver applications - authorization.

The state department is authorized to apply for health insurance flexibility and accountability waivers that will enable the state to add more flexibility to Colorado's medicaid program and that will result in a cost-effective method of providing health-care services to Coloradans.

The state department shall pursue and, if approved, implement a demonstration waiver that authorizes the state to use federal medical assistance payments authorized pursuant to section 1903(v) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, in coordination with the division of insurance to enhance or expand a state-subsidized individual health coverage plan as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15) and, only if needed to maximize federal financial participation, for Coloradans receiving state medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-2-104 or 25.5-5-201 (6). To the extent such federal funds are used to enhance or expand a state-subsidized individual health coverage plan, as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15), the health insurance affordability enterprise created pursuant to section 10-16-1204 must receive, deposit into the health insurance affordability cash fund created in section 10-16-1206, and allocate the federal share of the medical assistance payments pursuant to section 10-16-1205 (2), subject to any conditions set forth in the approval of the waiver.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1853, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2841, § 14, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25.5-1-111 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-4-504. Federal authorization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-222), ch. 226, p. 2265, § 3, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 2265.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-222, see section 1 of chapter 226, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-4-505. Federal authorization related to persons involved in the criminal justice system - assessment - report - repeal.

The state department shall evaluate and determine whether the state should seek additional federal authority to provide screening, brief intervention, and care coordination services through the medical assistance program to persons immediately prior to release from jail or a department of corrections facility and to improve processes for determining and redetermining individuals for medical assistance eligibility in order to improve continuity and access to health-care services. If the state department determines that securing additional federal authority will ensure improved access to care and continuity of care for individuals involved in the criminal justice system, the state department shall, subject to available resources, seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services for any additional federal authority. If the state department seeks approval, it shall notify the members of the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, and the members of the joint budget committee of the general assembly. If the state department receives federal approval, the state department, subject to available resources, shall provide the benefits described in this subsection (1).

If the state department determines that pursuing additional federal authority as described in subsection (1) of this section is inappropriate, the state department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly on or before October 1, 2023, that includes the following information:

An explanation of why the state department believes pursuing additional federal authority is not an appropriate way to improve continuity of care for justice-involved populations;

An alternative plan developed by the state department to ensure improved access to care and continuity of care for individuals involved in the criminal justice system who are being released from incarceration that details how the state department plans to ensure continuity of care for individuals being released from jail or prison;

A proposed timeline for implementation of the alternative plan; and

Any necessary fiscal or legislative proposals for the implementation of the state department's alternative plan.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1292, § 7, effective May 19.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-196, see section 1 of chapter 193, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.